New York, session 2025-2026, S3963.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The mental hygiene law is amended by adding a new section 2 32.05-b to read as follows: 3 § 32.05-b Certified recovery community centers. 4 1. The commissioner shall promulgate regulations consistent with this 5 section for the voluntary certification of certified recovery community 6 centers. 7 2. Such regulations shall be evidence-based, utilizing information 8 from sources with expertise in recovery. Such regulations shall, at a 9 minimum, provide guidance for: 10 (a) staffing; 11 (b) referrals to and coordination with community and peer-based 12 supports including support related to co-occurring disorders; 13 (c) participant safety; 14 (d) participant rights; 15 (e) confidentiality; 16 (f) re-occurrence support; and 17 (g) administrative and operational policies and procedures. 18 3. Once the commissioner has certified a location as a certified 19 recovery community center, such certified recovery community center 20 shall be included on the office's website as an available option for 21 individuals seeking such an environment. 22 4. The commissioner shall regulate and ensure that such centers which 23 are certified to be certified recovery community centers are continuing 24 to meet the requirements of this section. The commissioner has the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04979-01-5 S. 3963 2 1 authority to inspect such certified recovery community centers and 2 impose penalties, including limiting, revoking or suspending a certif- 3 ication, as appropriate, for failure to comply with the provisions of 4 this section. 5 5. The commissioner shall consult with the department of health to 6 ensure that the services provided by certified recovery community 7 centers are reimbursable in the state Medicaid system. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 10 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 11 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 12 on or before such effective date.